Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 1 General Provisions
63-3-128. [Repealed.]

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 1, repealed by Acts 2018, ch. 883, § 3, effective January 1, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Section 63-1-128, concerning prescriptions for Schedule II controlled substances, is repealed by Acts 2018, ch. 883, § 3, effective January 1, 2019.

Acts 2018, ch. 883, § 10 provided that the commissioner of health is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. All rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, title 4, chapter 5.

Former § 63-1-128, concerned prescriptions for Schedule II controlled substances.